District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

38-2201

Establishment of the 21st Century Public School Information Technology Program.

Expired.

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1402, 44 DCR 7378
1981 Ed., § 31-2521.

Sections 1401 to 1406 of D.C. Law 12-59 enacted §§ 31-2521 to 31-2525, comprising subchapter II of Chapter 25 of Title 31 1981 Ed. .

Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary addition of subchapter II, see §§ 1401 to 1406 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196); and see §§ 1401 to 1406 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
Section 2002 of D.C. Act 12-152 provided for the application of the act.
21st Century Public School Information Technology Program Act of 1997: Section 1401 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that title XIV of the act may be cited as the “21st Century Public School Information Technology Program Act of 1997.”
Editor’s Note Section 1406 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that this chapter shall expire in 4 years after March 20, 1998. Sections 38-2201 to 38-2205 expired effective March 21, 2002.